Georgia, session 2025_26, SB247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 4 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to sick, personal, and maternity leave for teachers and other school personnel, is
amended by revising Code Section 20-2-851, relating to use of accumulated sick leave for
personal or professional reasons, as follows:
"20-2-851.
During any school year, personnel may utilize up to a maximum of three five days of any
accumulated sick leave for the purpose of absenting themselves from their duties for
personal or professional reasons if prior approval of their absence is given by the local
school superintendent or his or her authorized representative; provided, however, that the
S. B. 247
- 1 -

LC 49 2268
absence is not in conflict with a local board of education policy concerning school days on
which the presence of the personnel requesting absence is essential for effective school
operation. No grant of approval for an absence permitted under this Code section shall be
conditioned upon disclosure of the specific purpose for which such absence is sought, nor
shall any such grant of approval be withheld or denied because of the failure or refusal of
personnel to disclose the specific purpose for which such an absence is sought; provided,
however, that personnel may be requested to state whether the absence is sought under the
category of 'personal' or 'professional' absence."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 247
- 2 -